src/third_party/mozjs/extract/intl/locales/is/hyphenation/hyph_is.dic
rs4k2i
rs4l1an
rsla2
rs2má
rs1m2
r1s2t
r2st1i
r4st4v
r3s4tö
rs2u
r5s2und
r4sú4
r1sv4
rt3að
rt2a5g
r3t2ak
rt4a4s2k
rt1as2
r5t4á4
rt5e4r
r2t3ey
rt2hu4
rt1h
r4tík
r1tí
r3tó
r3trö
rt4se
r4ts
rt5sl
rtt4
rt4ur1u
rt1u
rt4ú
r4t1v
rt4ve
r1tæ
rt1öf
r1uð
r4uðun
ruð1u
ruk4i
r2uk
ru5li
r2ul
ru2m
r1ur
r4uss
r3u2st.
rus2t
rut4v
r2ut
r4úð
3r4ú2m
rús2t5
r2ús
r1v
rv3að
rv2a2
r3ve
r2v2i
rv4i3g
rv3ing
rv1i2n
rv4un
r2vu
r3væ
r3yr
1rým
r1þ
1rækt
ræmd5a
1ræn
ræt3i
röf4ug
röf3u
rök1r
rö4l4
2sa.
4s2a1b
2s3að
s4að3f4
1s2ag
4sa1gr
4sagt
sal5at
s2al
4s3a2ld
1s2a2m
sa4m5b
4sa1m1e
sa4m3m
sa4m1s
sa1m5y
2s1an
s4an2ds
2s3ar
s4are
sarg4
s4aro4
s4arp
2s1as2
2s2at
sat4a
2s2a4u2
s3a2uk
4s2a1v
sá4
s3á1b
s5áf2
sá2l1ar5
s1ár
s3ás
s1b
s3d4
1se
2s1e2f
4seld.
se2l
se2l4d
5sem3i4
se2m
5sens
se2n
2se4r
2se2s
3set
sex3
2s1ey
s4eyð
1sé
s5f4
sfl4
sfr4
s1g4
sgl2
s1h
shá4s
s1i
s3ið.
5s4ið1a
s4ið1i
s4if2
si5fi
1s4i2g
sind4ar
s1i2n
sind4as2
5s2inn1u
sin2n
2s5ins
s3ir
s3is2t
si2s
s4is1v4
si3ta
s2it
sí3b4r2
1síð
síðk4
sígl4
sí2g
s3ík
s4í4m
sínk5a
sí2n
sínk2
s3ír
s1ís
s5íu.
sí3v
sí4ve
1sj
s3j2af
sj2a
sj1ar4
s4já
sjó5l
sjó3m4
sjó3s
4sj1u
3sjú
s2k
2sk.
4ska.
4sk1að
skaf4a
sk2af
4sk2al2
2sk1an
1sk2a4p
4skas2
1ská
1ske4i
3ske4mm
ske2m
4ske2n
3skey
s4k2i
2ski.
4sk3ið
sk3in1u
sk1i2n
3sk4ip
2sk1ir
4sk1i2s
3skír
5skjá
4sk4n
3skoð
s1ko
4s3kon
4s3ko4s
1s4k4o4t
1skó
5skó2g
1sk2rá
4skró
3skrú
4s4ks
sk3uri
s2k1u
sk3us2t
sk2us
2skv
1sky
3ský
1skæ
sla2
s4l2a3f
s4l2am
s3lan2ds5
sl2and
sl1an
3s4lé
sl2i2s
s1lí
s4líð
s3lo2f
slo4
s3lok
1sló
slu3s
s2lu
1sly2s
sly4
s3læk
s1m2
4sm2a
smá1s
s1má
smá5v
4s1me
s4me4k
s2mi
1s2mí
smj4
4s1mö
s2ne
3sneið
sne4i
5s4n4e4r
s3ne2s
3sneyd
sn4ið
s4n1i
sn2o
1snú
4s3n4ú2m3
s4ný
snæð5
s1næ
1so
4sod
3son
2sor
s5orð1i
sor4ð
1só4
s4ól
só1l3e
só2l3s
2sóm
s5óm4ag
sóm2a
4sós
1sp2
spí2t3
spj4
4spl2
4s4p2ra
2s1pró
s5p2und
sp1u
sr2an
s2ra
s5r2a4u2
s1rá
s1re
s1r4é
s1rí
s5ro4
s5ræ
s3rö
s3s4á4
s2s3e4r
s1se
ss5í
s1s4k4
ssl2
ss1m4
s2s5or
s1so
s1s2t
s4stir
sst1i
s1sv4
s2t
2st.
s4ta
2sta.
4st2al
4st2ap
5starfi
s4t1ar
st2arf
5starfs
4st2a3æ
1ste
3ste2f
3ste1i2n
ste4i4
5stekk
s1te4k
4stet
1sté
st4he4
st1h
4sti.
st1i
1st4i2g
st4isl
sti2s
3stí2g
s1tí
2s3t4ím
4stíu
1stj4
4stjó4n
5stjór
5stjör
st4jö
4stl
st3le
1sto4
3sto2f
1stó
4stó4n
3stór1
st2r
str5al
st2ra
5stranda
str2an
5str2ang
5str4au4m
str2a4u2
5strá.
1stre
3strí
4s1t4rú
s3try
5strön
st5t
2s4t1u
3st2und
1st2ú
4st1v
3stý
1stæ
2s3tæk
1s4tö
3stöð2
4s1tö4l
5stöng
s1u
s4u3f4
5s2um3a
s2ung
s5up2p1
s2up
s5u2ra
s2ust4i
sus2t
sú4
súln4
s5ú4n
s5úrs
sút5
sv4
4sv2ag
sv2a2
4sv2al
s3v2a4t
s5veð
s4ve2f
s2v2e4i
s3ve4ik
3sve1i2n
5s2vep
4svex
s4við1i
sv2i
sv4ið
5sviði.
s4v4ik
svi2k3u
s5v1i2n
s1vo
s2væ
1svæð
1sy
2s3yf1i
3sy4n
4s3yr
3s4ý
s1þ
1sæ
4sæð
s4æf4
sæ5f1a
3sæj3
3sæ2l
4sæs
1sö
3sö4g
sög2u5s
sö2g1u
2s3ö2ld
sö4l
3söm
2s3ör
t2að
ta2fr2
t2af
1taka
t2ak
5ta2k1end
ta1ke
take2n
t4al.
t2al
tal2a4m
4t2am
ta1m2a
t5am1t
t2a4ná
t1an
3t2ang
4t1ar
t4ar4að
ta2ra
tar5i2s5
tark4
t2arp4
tar5sá4
tar5æv4
t2aræ
t1as2
t4as.
t2a5sl
t2at4
ta4ví
t2a1v
t4á4
5tákn
4tánd
tá2n
t1b
t1d
4tegí
5te2g1u
te4i4
tein5g4
te1i2n
t1ei2s
1te4k
3tekj
tekkj5
t1end
te2n
ten5ó
4tepl2
t3ett
2tey
té4l
t3f2
tfirr4
t1g
t1h
th5ers
the4
the4r
t1i
ti4an
t2ia
ti5k4i2s
t4ik
tik3i
ti2ld4
t2il
4t1i2n
t2irk4
t4iræ
tis2t4
ti2s
t5i2st.
ti3s4ta
tist2il4
tist1i
t2is1v4
1t2it
1tí
4tí.
4tí1a
3tíð
t2í4l
3t4ím
4tí2n
4tít
tív3
t4jö
t1k
tk4a
t4k2i
t4l2af4
t3l2ag
t4lag.
tl2an
t4l5an2n
t1lá
tl2i
tl1ur4
t2lu
t1læ
2t3m4
tn2s
tns2k4
tnskr4
to4
1tog
t3on
3torg
5tor1u
1tóm
tóm3a
tóm5as2
5tón1l2
tó4n
tór1
tór5a4u2
tó2ra
tór4i3s
tó4ri
t1ót
t3p
tr2a2b
t2ra
5traðari
tr1að
trað3ar
trað1a
tr3alí
tr2al
tr2an
tr3an2n
t4r5ar
3trau4s
tr2a4u2
t4rey
1tr4é
tr4i2s
t5ris1i
t5rík3a4
3trj
t5róf
tr3ótt
tr3ug
tr3un1a
tr5u4n1i
1t4rú
1try
t5ryð
t3ræn
3tröð2
4ts
t1sa
ts4in2n
ts1i
ts1i2n
t5sí
t1sj4
t1s2k4
ts1s
t1s2t4
ts4u
t2sy
tt3að
ttak4i
tt2ak
tt2ar5f
t4t1ar
tt5á4
tte5rí
tte4r
tt5ern
t4tí
tt5j
tt1l
tt1or
tto4
tt3ræ
tt3ug
tt1u
tt4ugl4
tt1v4
t1tæ
t1u
4tu.
t4uð1i
tugl4
t2ug
t2uk4
tu3l4ið
t2ul
tum2
tu5m1i2n
t4umi
t2ung
3t4ungl
t2up4
t3ur3e
tur3k
t5urs
t4usa
t4us1u
tutr4
t2ut
túd3
t3úð
tú4l
1tú4n
tún4a
t1úr
tú3s2k
t2ús
t1v
5tveggj
t1veg
t5v4e4r
5týs
t1þ
3tæk
1tök
1tö4l
t5ö2ls
2u1a
u3af
u5a4u2
2u1á4
uáætl4
4u1b4
4uc
4ud4
u1da
u5dá
u3de
u3dó
u3dr
2uð1a
uð4are
uð1ar
uð3k4
2uðl
uð1m4
2uð4n
2uðr
uð5ri2s
uð4se
uð3sv4
uð5sæ
4uð2ul
uð1u
2u5e
4ué
4uf
uf5á
ufd4
u5f2it
u3fj
u1fr2
u3f2ul
uf1u
u5fú
2ug
4ug2al
ug1a
4ug2at
4u1ge
4ug2il
ug1i
4u1gj
4ugla
ug1lj
4ug2lu
ug4n
4ugó
u5gr4an
ug2ra
4ugre
4ugrj
4u3gró
ug3ræ
ug3ta
4u1gö4
4u1h
4ui
u5ið
4uí4
2uj
2uk
uk2ak4
uk4as2
u1ke
u5k1i2nn1i2n
uk1i2n
ukin2n
ukin4n1i
ukk2u3s
uk2k1u
u5kó
u3kv
2ul
3ul.
4u1l2ag
u2l3ar
3u2l1b
4u1le
u5l2ind
ul1i2n
ul4i2s
u1lí
u2l3k2
ul4la
u2ll
4ulln
ul4lt4
4u3lo4
u3ló
ul5sv4
u2ls
ult4i
u4lt
ul3us
u2lu
u2l5v4
u3læ
4u1lö
3um.
2um2a
um4ak4
u1m1an
um4ar1an
um1a2r
um3a2ra
2u1má
umá2l4ar
u3má2l
um4b2a
u4mb
um5bæ
um4bö
2umd
2u1me
um3e1i2n
ume4i
4umi
umj4
um4k2i
um1k
4um1l
um2m4a
u4mm
4u5mo
2umó
4ump
2umr
u4ms4
um3sl
3um2st.
ums2t
um1t4
4um1u
um5un2n
um2un
4umú
2u1my
2u3mý
2u1mæ
2u1mö
un3ar1
un1a
una2r5a
un2as2
4un2at4
2u1n2a4u2
2u1ná
2und
4u1ne
4unk2
2un1n1á
un2n
4unns
2unn1u
unn5ug
4uno
4unó
un2s4an
4unt
1un1u
4unur
4u1næ
4unö
2u3o
uol4
4uó
2up
up2p1
upp5a
upp2al5
upp4i
3ur.
2u2ra
ur2a4f
ur5a4m
ur2an
ur5ann1a
uran2n
2urá
urð4a5r4á4
ur4ð
urð1a
urð1ar
2ure
u1re4k
ur3ey
4u1r4é
urf4a
ur3fl
ur1g4e
ur3gj
u4r5i2n
4u1r2i4t
4urí
u3rík
ur3j4
urk4a
ur1m
ur3ní
4uro4
4uró
ur1s2k4
ur3sn1a
ur4s4ta
ur1s2t
ur4svö
ur1sv4
ur5t2il
urt1i
urt4ir
ur1u
ur4un2n
4urus
ur3v4
ur4vi2s
ur2v2i
4uryk
4urý
2uræ
4urö
2usa
u3s2al
4us4á4
2u1se
4usí
2u1sj
4u1s2k
4usl
2u3s4m2
2usn
4u1so
4u1só4
4u1sp2
u5st2arf
us2t
us4ta
us4t1ar
4ust4á4
4u1ste
2u1sté
2ust1i
2us1tí
4u1sto4
4u1stó
4ust2r
3us4tu.
u2s4t1u
2u1st2ú
4usty
4u3stý
4u1stæ
4u1s4tö
u5s2und
us1u
4u3sv4
4u1sy
2u3s4ý
2u1sö
2ut
ut3að
ut2as2
u3te
u5t2il
ut1i
u3tó
ut4stó
u4ts
ut1s2t4
ut2ú
u1tæ
2u3u
4u5ú
4u3v
2uy
u3yf
2u1þ
4uæ
2u5ö
ú1a
ú2al4
ú3arf
ú1ar
úb3a2n
úb2a
úbli3
úb4l2
úð3ar
úð1a
úð5g
ú3e
úf5ar
úfl2
úf5li
úf5ly4
úfs4á4
ú5gala
úg1a
úg2al
úgó3
ú4gæ
4ú1i
úk1l2
úkr1u
ú4k4s
ú2l5e4r
ú1le
5úl4f
úlf5al
úl4í3
ú4l4íp4
ú3lo4
4ú2m
úm4r
úm4s1i
ú4ms
ú4n
únd4ug
únd1u
ún4gö4
úpl5i
úpl2
úr5e2f
úrít4
úr5sl
úr1t
úr3un
úr5v
ú3ræ
2ús
ú4sa
ús3e4i
ú1se
ús3í
ús4st1i
ús1s2t
ús4sv4
ús1v4
út3e
út2he4
út1h
út4i5f
út1i
út2i2s
útj4
út1l2
út1r
4ú1u
ú1v
ú4v2a2
ú5þ
v2a2
vaðr5
v1að
va5fo
v2af
v4a5h
5vall2ag
v2al
va2ll
v1a4n
var4m2a
v1ar
varp2s3
v2arp
v2ar5ú
var4v4
v3as2t
vas2
v2a4t
3vax
veð5l
ve3fe
ve2f
1veg
v2e4i
3veið
vein4as2
ve1i2n
vein1a
5vei2s
4ve4lg
ve2l
2vep
v4e4r
1v4er4ð
ver3gj
3ver2k
ver2s
vé2
v5és
v3ét5
2v3h
v2i
2vi.
v4ið
5við1ar
við1a
við3l
vil4i
v2il
vi3lið
3viln
vi4lo4
vin3gj
v1i2n
4v2ip
3v2irk
visk5un
vi2s
v2is2k
vis2k2u
3viss
vis4v4
5vita
v2it
vit1k5
vit2n
4v4i1v
4víb
2víð
5vík
3vís1i
vísl3a2
vísl2
ví1v
2vn
vo3k
vol4
vork4
vor4r
4vr1
4vs
2vu
v1uð
v1un
5væg
wa4
win4s4
w1i2n
x5ar
x2as2
x3e
x3f
x5i
xi2s4
xí3
xík4
x5íu
xt5að
x1u4
y5b2a
yð2s
yf5a
yf1i
yfj5að
yfj4a
yft4i2s
yft1i
y1i
yj3ar
yj2a
yj5ó
yk5e
yk3i
yk3s1u
y4ks
y2k3u
yk3v
ylf5i
ylgn4
y4lg
yll5a
y2ll
y2l4v
ym3a
ymp5í
y4n
ynj5ar
ynj2a
ynj3ó
yn4k2
yn4t
yn5u
yp2us
yp1u
yr5e
yr1i
yr3il
y4r3ir3
yrj3
yrkv3a2
yr2l2
yr2s
yr1u
y2s
y1sj3
ys2s
yst3ug
ys2t
y2s4t1u
yt4h
yt2il4
yt1i
yt4k
y3v
ý5a
ý2af5
ý5á
ýð2s
ýfl4
ý3f2lu
ýg4r
ýg4uð
ý2g1u
ý1i
ýj2a5f4
ýj2a
ým4a
ým4k
ýpru4
ýp2s
ýrf4
ýr4i3m
ýr2i5p4
ýr3l2
ý4s1i
ý1s4i2g4
ýs4l
ýs4m2
ý3st4á4
ýs2t
ý5u
ý5ú
ý3v
ý5y
zó4
þ2a
þ2am4
þarf5a
þ1ar
þ2arf
þar4m
4þb
þ2i
þist3i
þi2s
þis2t
þjó4
þol5a
þor3f4
þor3g
þorm4
þ6ó
þ1ól
3þór
þó4r5i
þ2r2
þ2ra4
þrás4
þri2s4
þ4r2íl4
þrí3t
þru4
þ2um5a
þu4mb3
þur2
þ2ús3
þ2v
þver5s2k
þv4e4r
þver2s
æ1b
æðn5
æðni2s5
æð4n1i
æð2s
æð4ug
æð1u
4æf
æf1a
æ4fi
æf3us2t
æf1u
æ4f2us
æg5is2t
æg1i
ægi2s
æ1i
æj3
æj4al2
æj2a
æjark4
æj1ar
æk1a
æk1li
ækl2
æ2k3u
æ2l
æl3an
æ1l3e
æl3us
æ2lu
æm3a
æm4al
æ4mund1u
æm1u
æm2un
æ1m2und
æn2ak4
æn1a
æn4k2
æ2r1a
ær3e
ærgöng5
ær1gö4
ær4if4
ær3is2t
æri2s
æri3s1v4
ær3l2
ær4n
ær2s
ær5un
ær1us
æ5rú
æs4i2s
æs1i
æt5i1se
æt1i
æti2s
ætl5i
æ5u
æv2a5g
æv2a2
æ5v2al
æv3ar
æv4a2ra
æ3ve
æv3i2n
æv2i
öð2
öðl3
öð1m5
öð3un
öð1u
öðv5a4n
öð1v
öðv2a2
öðv3ar
ö1fa
öfl3ó
ö4fn5
öfr3u4
öfr2
öf3u
ö4g
ög3gj
ögg2v3
ög1re
ög2us
ö2g1u
ök5e
ök5rá
ök3s2t
ö4ks
ök3ul
ö2k1u
ökv3a2
ö4l
öl1f4
ö2lk2
öl4u5mi
ö2lu
öl1um
öl5un
ö2l2v
ölv5a4n
öl2v2a2
ö4m4b
öm3u
önd4l2
öng5s1v4
ön4gs
öng4us
ön2g1u
öng4v
öng2v3a2
önk3
önn4l2
ön2n
ön3ug
ön1u
ön5un
ör1e
ör4ge
ör4l1an
ör1l2
örm5un
örm1u
ör3ó
ör3ug
ör1un
ör3und
örus4
ör2v
4örv2a2
örv5al
örv5a4n
örv5ar
ör2v4i
ör1y
ör5æ
ö4s
ösk3ul
ös2k
ös2k1u
ös3u
ö4t4s
ö3t2ug
öt1u
öt2v
ötv3a2
ö5u
